District of Columbia statutes.
32-1602.01

Participant eligibility criteria.

Any individual who receives an Individual Training Account as provided in Chapter 5, section 134 [29 U.S.C. § 2864 ] of the Federal Act shall be a bona fide resident of the District.

History

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-150, § 3a
as added Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 1702, 50 DCR 5668

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1702 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1702 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).

Short Title

Short title of title XVII of Law 15-39: Section 1701 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that title XVII of the act may be cited as the Residency Requirement for Individual Training Accounts Funded by the Workforce Investment Act Amendment Act of 2003.